Vermont, session 2025-2026, S140.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 7046 is added to read:
§ 7046. SECOND LOOK SENTENCING
(a) Short title. This section may be cited as the “Second Look Act.”
(b) Definitions. As used in this section:
VT LEG #379939 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.140
2025 Page 2 of 18
(1) “Authorized representative” means the incarcerated person’s
counsel, family member, or a licensed health care professional.
(2) “Developmental disability” has the same meaning as in 18 V.S.A.
§ 9302.
(3) “Family member” has the same meaning as in subdivision 5301(2)
of this title.
(4) “Intellectual disability” has the same meaning as in 1 V.S.A. § 146.
(5) “Mental illness” has the same meaning as in 18 V.S.A. § 7101(14).
(6) “Successor judge” means the current judge presiding in the judicial
unit where the original sentence was imposed if the original sentencing judge
is unavailable.
(7) “Victim” has the same meaning as in subdivision 5301(4) of this
title.
(c) Eligibility.
(1) An incarcerated person may petition the judge who presided when
the original sentence was imposed for a reduction of the person’s sentence if
the person has served the lesser of:
(A) 10 years in custody of the Department of Corrections; or
(B) at least 50 percent of person’s sentence, provided the person was
sentenced to at least five years of incarceration.
VT LEG #379939 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.140
2025 Page 3 of 18
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, an
otherwise ineligible incarcerated person shall be deemed eligible to petition for
a reduction in sentence upon consent of the prosecutor, regardless of the
person’s number of years in custody.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if a petition for a
reduction in sentence filed pursuant to this section has been denied, the
incarcerated person or an authorized representative shall not file another
petition until at least two years have elapsed after the date the preceding
petition was denied. A court may require a waiting period longer than two
years, but in no event shall the waiting period be more than five years after the
date the preceding petition was denied.
(4) When a petition for a reduction in sentence made pursuant to this
section has been granted and the total term of incarceration was reduced by at
least 25 percent, the incarcerated person or an authorized representative shall
not file a petition for a second sentencing reduction until at least five years
have elapsed after the date the preceding petition was granted.
(d) Procedure; petition.
(1) After a person has served 40 percent of the person’s sentence in
custody, the Department of Corrections shall, within 30 days, give written
notice of this section to the incarcerated person and to the person’s counsel or,
if the person is unrepresented, to the Office of the Defender General. The
VT LEG #379939 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.140
2025 Page 4 of 18
Department shall also give written notice of this section to the incarcerated
person and to the person’s counsel or, if the person is unrepresented, to the
Office of the Defender General, within 30 days after serving nine years and
seven months in custody.
(2) A petition for a sentence reduction pursuant to this section may be
filed six months prior to the date upon which a person becomes eligible for a
reduction in sentence pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.
(3) The petition shall be filed by the incarcerated person, a prosecutor,
or an authorized representative. A petition filed by an authorized
representative shall be accompanied by an affidavit stating:
(A) the reason that the incarcerated person is unable to file the
petition;
(B) a factual statement explaining the petitioner’s relationship to the
incarcerated person; and
(C) how the authorized representative is acting in the best interests of
the incarcerated person.
(4) The petition must be filed in writing in the Superior Court in which
the original sentence was imposed and may include affidavits, declarations,
letters, prison records, or other relevant written and electronic material. The
petition shall include the following:
(A) the name of the petitioner;
VT LEG #379939 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.140
2025 Page 5 of 18
(B) the name of the incarcerated person if different than the
petitioner;
(C) any docket number relevant to the petitioner’s resentencing
request;
(D) the name of the judge assigned to any docket number relevant to
the petitioner’s resentencing request;
(E) the offense and specific counts for which the incarcerated person
was convicted relating to the resentencing request;
(F) the current term of incarceration being served by the incarcerated
person relating to the resentencing request; and
(G) a factual statement explaining how the incarcerated person meets
the eligibility requirements described in subsection (c) of this section.
(e) Hearings.
(1) Upon the court’s receipt of a petition filed pursuant to this section,
the court shall, within 30 days, provide the prosecutor, the petitioner, and the
incarcerated person if not the petitioner with a copy of the petition, including
any attached material.
(2) A petition made pursuant to this section shall be referred to the judge
who presided over the imposition of the original sentence upon the petitioner.
If, at the time of the petition to the court, the original sentencing judge is no
longer available, then the petition shall be assigned to the successor judge.
VT LEG #379939 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.140
2025 Page 6 of 18
(3) Upon receiving the petition, the court shall determine whether the
incarcerated person has served at least 10 years in custody of the Department
of Corrections or at least 50 percent of the person’s sentence, provided that the
person was sentenced to at least five years of incarceration. If the court
determines that the incarcerated person has met the requirements of this
subdivision, or if the prosecutor otherwise consents, the court shall set a
hearing.
(4) Unless the court finds good cause to hold the hearing at a later date
or at the request of the petitioner, the court shall set the hearing not more than
45 days after the date the petition is filed with the court if one or more of the
following circumstances are met:
(A) The incarcerated person has one or more medical conditions
leading to major limitations in activities of daily living, including mental
illness or an intellectual or developmental disability.
(B) The incarcerated person has one or more medical conditions
increasing the likelihood of contracting an illness or disease while incarcerated
that could lead to death or cause the person to develop a medical condition that
could prevent the performance of one or more activities of daily living without
assistance. These conditions include any condition related to a weakened
immune system, including human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) or acquired
immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS); debilitating health conditions that occur
VT LEG #379939 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.140
2025 Page 7 of 18
as a result of dementia, Alzheimer’s disease, or similar degenerative brain
disorders; cardiovascular disease; chronic lung disease or asthma; diabetes;
hepatitis C; seizure disorders; the need for life-sustaining care such as feeding
tubes or colostomy bags; disabling neurological disorders such as multiple
sclerosis (MS) or amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS); or any condition that
requires or is expected to require specialty care or recurrent hospitalizations.
(C) The petition is filed by a prosecutor.
(5) If the petition does not meet the criteria of subdivision (4) of this
subsection, unless the court finds good cause to hold the hearing at a later date
or at the request of the petitioner, the court shall set the hearing date not more
than:
(A) 90 days after the date the petition is filed upon a finding that the
incarcerated person has served over 20 years of the person’s sentence and is
over 55 years of age; or
(B) 180 days after the date the petition is filed upon a finding that the
incarcerated person does not meet the criteria of subdivisions (4) and (5)(A) of
this subsection (e).
(6) If the court determines that the petitioner has not met the
requirements pursuant to subdivisions (4) and (5) of this subsection (e) and the
prosecutor does not consent, the court shall enter an order denying the petition
and shall provide a copy of the order to the petitioner and, if the incarcerated
VT LEG #379939 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.140
2025 Page 8 of 18
person is not the petitioner, to the incarcerated person. The petitioner or
incarcerated person may appeal this denial pursuant to subsection (i) of this
section.
(7) Upon setting a hearing, the court shall appoint counsel pursuant to
chapter 163 of this title, if necessary. The court may direct the parties to
supplement the record by submitting additional materials relating to the
petition, if necessary. A petition filed under this section may be freely
amended at any time prior to the hearing.
(8) Upon a determination that the petition establishes eligibility pursuant
to subdivision (c) of this section and the petition is assigned to a successor
judge, the court shall not reconsider the sufficiency of the petition or decline to
set a hearing.
(9) When the court sets a resentencing hearing pursuant to this
subsection, the court shall notify the petitioner, the incarcerated person if
different than the petitioner; the Department of Corrections; and the prosecutor
of the hearing date.
(10) At a hearing pursuant to this subsection, the court may allow the
parties to present any evidence that is relevant to the issue of a reduction in
sentencing. Relevant evidence includes documents, testimony, tangible
objects, or any other information germane to sentencing.
VT LEG #379939 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.140
2025 Page 9 of 18
(11) At a hearing under this section, the incarcerated person shall be
present unless the person waives the right to be present. The incarcerated
person shall have the right to testify or to remain silent at the person’s sole
discretion. The incarcerated person shall be considered present for the
purposes of the hearing if appearing by video teleconference upon consent of
the parties.
(12) Any hearing under this section shall be recorded or transcribed.
(f) Grounds for sentence modification.
(1) The court shall consider any evidence that is relevant to the issue of
a reduction in sentencing, including:
(A) the history and characteristics of the incarcerated person at the
time of the petition for a reduction in sentence, including rehabilitation
demonstrated by the incarcerated person; the incarcerated person’s disciplinary
record while incarcerated; and the incarcerated person’s efforts to participate in
educational, therapeutic, and vocational opportunities while imprisoned;
(B) the age of the incarcerated person at the time of the offense and
research regarding child, adolescent, and young adult brain development that
meets evidentiary standards under the Vermont Rules of Evidence;
(C) the age of the incarcerated person at the time of the sentence
modification petition and research regarding desistance that meets evidentiary
standards under the Vermont Rules of Evidence;
VT LEG #379939 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.140
2025 Page 10 of 18
(D) the nature of the incarcerated person’s offense, including
changing societal attitudes regarding the propriety of criminalizing the offense
and the appropriate sentence for the offense;
(E) the circumstances surrounding the incarcerated person’s offense,
including the person’s role in its commission, whether the person was under
the influence of another person, and the proportionality of the person’s
sentence compared to that received by other parties to the offense;
(F) the circumstances of the incarcerated person’s incarceration,
including the person’s conditions of confinement; the impact of the person’s
incarceration on the community; and any evidence that the person was
subjected to physical, sexual, or psychological abuse while incarcerated;
(G) information concerning the incarcerated person’s current
physical or mental health and the person’s physical or mental health at the time
of the offense;
(H) information that the incarcerated person was denied effective
assistance of counsel at any stage in the case leading to the original sentence,
including the ineffective assistance of counsel during plea bargaining;
(I) information that the incarcerated person was wrongfully
convicted;
VT LEG #379939 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.140
2025 Page 11 of 18
(J) information that the incarcerated person was subjected to human
trafficking and that such victimization was a contributing factor to the person’s
criminal behavior;
(K) information that the incarcerated person was subjected to
physical, sexual, or psychological abuse by an intimate partner or a family or
household member and that such victimization was a contributing factor to the
person’s criminal behavior; or
(L) any other information the court deems relevant.
(2) The court shall set forth, either in open court on the day of the
hearing or in writing within 30 days after the hearing, the reasons for granting
or denying a petition under this section.
(g) Sentence modification.
(1) In calculating the new term to be served by the incarcerated person,
the court may consider a calculation of the shortest and longest lengths of time
the person may be incarcerated under the individual’s existing sentence, taking
into account the effect for time served as ordered by the court pursuant to
section 7031 of this title, the provisions for reductions of term pursuant to 28
V.S.A. § 811, and the provisions for earned time pursuant to 28 V.S.A. § 818.
The court may request these calculations from the Commissioner of
Corrections.
VT LEG #379939 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.140
2025 Page 12 of 18
(2) Upon the court’s determination that the incarcerated person meets
the criteria pursuant to subdivision (e)(4)(A) of this section, there shall be a
rebuttable presumption that the person’s sentence shall be reduced to time
served.
(3) Upon the court’s determination that the incarcerated person does not
pose a significant risk to the community, there shall be a rebuttable
presumption that the person’s sentence shall be reduced by at least 20 percent
or reduced to a period not longer than five years of incarceration from the date
of the filing of the petition, whichever results in a shorter term of incarceration.
(4) If the prosecutor is the petitioner, the new term of incarceration to be
served by the incarcerated person shall not be lengthier than the
recommendation of the petitioner but may be shorter.
(5) A court’s order granting an incarcerated person’s sentence
modification shall be limited to the imposition of:
(A) time served;
(B) immediate parole;
(C) sentencing alternatives pursuant to section 7030 of this title;
(D) a lower minimum term of incarceration; or
(E) a lower maximum term of incarceration.
VT LEG #379939 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.140
2025 Page 13 of 18
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the court to
impose a sentence of life without parole or an increase to the incarcerated
person’s sentence in any circumstance.
(h) Victim’s rights.
(1) Upon receipt of a petition filed pursuant to this section, the
prosecutor shall promptly notify any victim of the incarcerated person of the
hearing date once it is scheduled.
(2) The victim has the right to appear and the right to make a statement,
oral or written, at the sentencing of the incarcerated person regarding the
victim’s view of the crime, the person convicted, and the sentence.
(3) The court shall not, in modifying a sentence, disturb any restitution
awarded to a victim at the original sentencing.
(i) Appeal.
(1) Any party to a petition filed pursuant to this section shall have the
right to appeal to the Supreme Court on the grounds that the sentence
modification or its imposition is unlawful. The petitioner or incarcerated
person shall also have the right to appeal to the Supreme Court on the ground
that the sentence is otherwise contrary to considerations of sentencing pursuant
to section 7030 of this title. The petitioner or incarcerated person may also
appeal on the ground that the petitioner’s request for a hearing was unlawfully
denied.
VT LEG #379939 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.140
2025 Page 14 of 18
(2) The right to appeal a sentence modification pursuant to this
subsection shall be as of right on the same terms as a first appeal from an
initial sentence at the time of conviction.
(j) Construction.
(1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to abridge or modify any
existing remedy an incarcerated person may have pursuant to subchapter 2 of
this chapter; habeas corpus; other statutory or judicial postconviction relief; or
any other legal framework.
(2) A petition filed pursuant to this section shall not impact in any way
or be impacted in any way by any pending petitions pursuant to subchapter 2
of this chapter; habeas corpus; or other postconviction proceedings, nor shall
the denial of a petition filed pursuant to this section preclude these remedies
from being pursued or granted.
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. chapter 221, subchapter 5 is added to read:
Subchapter 5. Petition for Compassionate Release
§ 7141. PETITION
An offender who is serving a sentence of incarceration in the custody of the
Commissioner of Corrections may petition the Superior Court of the county
where the sentence was imposed for an order granting compassionate release.
The petition may be informal but shall be in writing and shall include the
offender’s name, offense, date of sentencing, sentence, and an explanation of
VT LEG #379939 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.140
2025 Page 15 of 18
why compassionate release is appropriate for the offender and how the
offender satisfies the factors set forth in section 7142 of this subchapter. The
offender shall serve a copy of the offender’s petition upon the superintendent
of the facility in which the offender is incarcerated.
§ 7142. NOTICE, HEARING, AND DECISION
(a) Unless the petition and the files and records of the case conclusively
show that the offender is not entitled to relief, the court shall cause notice to be
served upon the Office of the Attorney General and the State’s Attorney. The
Office of the Attorney General and a State’s Attorney who receive notice may
elect to appear as parties.
(b) The court may decide the petition upon the files and records of the case
or may grant a hearing. If the court grants a hearing, the court may entertain
and decide the petition without requiring the offender to attend the hearing.
(c) The court shall grant the petition if it finds by a preponderance of the
evidence that:
(1) the offender:
(A) has been diagnosed with a terminal, incurable disease and has a
life expectancy of 18 months or less;
(B) has been diagnosed with an incurable and progressive illness or
has suffered a debilitating injury and:
(i) cannot provide self-care and is confined to a bed or chair; or
VT LEG #379939 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.140
2025 Page 16 of 18
(ii) can only provide limited self-care and is confined to a bed or
chair for at least 50 percent of the inmate’s waking hours; or
(C) is 65 years of age or older and:
(i) suffers from a chronic or serious medical condition; or
(ii) is experiencing deteriorating mental or physical health that
diminishes the inmate’s ability to function in a correctional facility;
(2) the offender is not a danger to the community and the offender’s
release will not endanger public safety; and
(3) compassionate release is appropriate.
(d) If the court grants the petition, it may reduce the term of imprisonment
and may impose a term of probation or supervised release with or without
conditions that does not exceed the original term of imprisonment.
§ 7143. APPEALS
An appeal may be taken to the Supreme Court from the order entered on the
petition.
§ 7144. ASSIGNMENT OF COUNSEL
The court may appoint counsel if, financially, the offender is unable to
employ counsel, and may order that all necessary costs and expenses, including
court costs, stenographic services, printing, and reasonable compensation for
legal services, be paid by the State from the appropriation to the court where
VT LEG #379939 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.140
2025 Page 17 of 18
the sentence was imposed. On appeal, the Supreme Court may make a similar
order.
Sec. 3. 28 V.S.A. § 501 is amended to read:
§ 501. ELIGIBILITY FOR PAROLE CONSIDERATION
(a) An inmate offender who is serving a sentence of imprisonment who is
not eligible for presumptive parole pursuant to section 501a of this title shall be
eligible for parole consideration as follows:
(1) If the inmate’s offender’s sentence has no minimum term or a zero
minimum term, the inmate offender shall be eligible for parole consideration
within 12 months after commitment to a correctional facility.
(2) If the inmate’s offender’s sentence has a minimum term, the inmate
offender shall be eligible for parole consideration paroled after the inmate
offender has served the minimum term of the sentence unless the offender has
programming requirements that have not been fulfilled or has received a major
disciplinary report within the previous 12 months.
(3) If the offender has a serious medical condition that requires regular
hospital visits and the inmate is designated low-risk, the offender shall be
eligible for parole.
(4) If the offender is 55 years of age or older but under 65 years of age,
is designated low-risk, and has served 10 years but not served the minimum of
the sentence, the offender shall be paroled, unless the offender has
VT LEG #379939 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.140
2025 Page 18 of 18
programming requirements that have not been fulfilled or has received a major
disciplinary report within the previous 12 months.
(5) If the offender is 65 years of age or older, has served five years but
not served the minimum term of the sentence, and is designated low-risk, the
offender shall be paroled, unless the offender has programming requirements
that have not been fulfilled or has received a major disciplinary report within
the previous 12 months.
(b) For purposes of this section, “major disciplinary report” includes
violations for violent acts or serious threats to institutional security or personal
safety and does not include drug possession.
Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY
Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, Sec. 1 of this act shall apply to sentences
imposed prior to the effective date of this act.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379939 v.2